Washington statutes.
RCW 18.96.120

Unprofessional conduct—Grounds for disciplinary action.

The board may impose any action in RCW 18.235.110 upon the following grounds:

(1) Offering to pay, paying, or accepting, either directly or indirectly, any substantial gift, bribe, or other consideration to influence the award of professional work;

(2) Being willfully untruthful or deceptive in any professional report, statement, or testimony;

(3) Having a financial interest in the bidding for or the performance of a contract to supply labor or materials for or to construct a project for which employed or retained as a landscape architect except with the consent of the client or employer after disclosure of such facts; or allowing an interest in any business to affect a decision regarding landscape architectural work for which retained, employed, or called upon to perform;

(4) Signing or permitting a seal to be affixed to any drawings or specifications that were not prepared or reviewed by the landscape architect or under the landscape architect's personal supervision by persons subject to the landscape architect's direction and control; or

(5) Willfully evading or trying to evade any law, ordinance, code, or regulation governing site or landscape construction.

[ 2009 c 370 s 12; 2002 c 86 s 235; 1997 c 58 s 827; 1969 ex.s. c 158 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 370 ss 1-16, 18, 20, and 21: See note following RCW 18.96.010.

Finding—2009 c 370: See note following RCW 18.96.010.

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.